Maine, session 132, LD2044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-X, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Transferability. A taxpayer who has received a letter of certification from the
Commissioner of Environmental Protection pursuant to subsection 4 but has not yet
claimed the credit may, with prior notice to the assessor on a form developed by the
assessor, transfer the certification in whole or in part to any individual or entity, and the
transferee may apply the credit against the transferee's Maine income tax liability with the
same effect as if the transferee had engaged in the production of the biofuels. A transferee
of the credit is subject to the same limitations and carry-forward provisions as the taxpayer
who generated the credit. The transferee may claim the credit on the transferee's Maine
income tax return and must attach a copy of the transferred letter of certification to the
transferee's Maine income tax return together with a statement showing how much of the
credit has been transferred to the taxpayer.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5219-XX, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Transferability. A taxpayer who is entitled to claim a tax credit under this section
may transfer the credit in accordance with this subsection. The taxpayer shall provide the
assessor with the information required by subsection 5 and rules adopted by the assessor.
The assessor shall review the information submitted by the taxpayer and determine whether
the taxpayer is eligible for the credit. If the assessor determines that the taxpayer is eligible
for the credit, the assessor shall issue a certificate of approval to the taxpayer. A taxpayer
who has received a certificate of approval from the assessor but has not yet claimed the
credit may, with prior notice to the assessor on a form developed by the assessor, transfer
the certificate in whole or in part to any individual or entity, and the transferee may apply
the credit against the transferee's Maine income tax liability with the same effect as if the
transferee had engaged in the production of the renewable chemicals. A transferee of the
credit is subject to the same limitations and carry-forward provisions as the taxpayer who
generated the credit. The transferee may claim the credit on the transferee's Maine income
tax return and must attach a copy of the transferred certificate of approval together with a
statement showing how much of the credit has been transferred to the taxpayer. A taxpayer
who transfers a credit under this subsection may not claim a credit that has been transferred.